Ohio, session 136, HB139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3737.834 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3737.834. (A) The state fire marshal shall ensure 6
that the inspection, testing, and maintenance of fire hydrant 7
systems in the state are conducted in accordance with this 8
section, the rules adopted as part of the state fire code, and 9
the recommended standards by the national fire protection 10
association. 11
(B) The fire marshal shall require any person or entity 12
responsible for maintaining a fire hydrant system to 13
periodically test that system. Fire hydrant systems shall be 14
maintained in an operative condition at all times and shall be 15
repaired where defective. Additions, repairs, alterations, and 16
servicing shall comply with all approved standards. Records of 17

H. B. No. 139 Page 2
As Introduced
tests, repairs, and regular maintenance shall be retained for 18
not less than one year after the subsequent test, repair, or 19
maintenance, as applicable, and shall be available for 20
inspection by the fire marshal. 21
(C) At minimum, the fire hydrant systems and the 22
associated service mains and water tanks shall be periodically 23
inspected, tested, and maintained at the following intervals: 24
(1) Fire hydrants of all types shall be inspected annually 25
and after each operation. A flow test and general maintenance 26
for the fire hydrant shall be conducted annually. 27
(2) Fire service main piping shall be inspected annually 28
and a flow test shall be conducted every five years. 29
(3) Fire service main piping strainers shall be inspected 30
and receive general maintenance care after each use. 31